doc/sk_stem/stem_Unicode.sbl
routines (
	//RV R1
	lower_case
	mark_regions
	rule1
	un_accent
)

stringescapes {}

groupings ( v )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

externals ( stem )

// Znaky UTF8

stringdef A"   hex 'C1'    // dlhe a
stringdef A:   hex 'C4'    // siroke a
stringdef C<   hex '10C'   // c s makcenom
stringdef D<   hex '10E'   // d s makcenom
stringdef DZ<  hex '64 17D' // dz s makcenom
stringdef E"   hex 'C9'    // e s dlznom
stringdef E<   hex '11A'   // e s makcenom
stringdef I"   hex 'CD'    // i s dlznom
stringdef L"   hex '139'   // l s dlznom
stringdef L<   hex '13E'   // l s makcenom
stringdef N<   hex '13D'   // n s makcenom
stringdef O>   hex 'D4'    // o s vokanom
stringdef O"   hex 'D3'    // o s dlznom
stringdef R"   hex '154'   // r s dlznom
stringdef R<   hex '158'   // r s makcenom
stringdef S<   hex '160'   // s s makcenom
stringdef T<   hex '164'   // t s makcenom
stringdef U"   hex 'DA'    // u s dlznom
stringdef U^   hex '16E'   // u s kruzkom
stringdef Y"   hex 'DD'    // y s dlznom
stringdef Z<   hex '17D'   // z s makcenom


stringdef a"   hex 'E1'    // dlhe a
stringdef a:   hex 'E4'    // siroke a
stringdef c<   hex '10D'   // c s makcenom
stringdef d<   hex '10F'   // d s makcenom
stringdef dz   'dz'        // dz
stringdef dz<  hex '64 17E' // dz s makcenom
stringdef e"   hex 'E9'    // e s dlznom
stringdef e<   hex '11B'   // e s makcenom
stringdef ch   'ch'        // ch
stringdef i"   hex 'ED'    // i s dlznom
stringdef l"   hex '13A'   // l s dlznom
stringdef l<   hex '13E'   // l s makcenom
stringdef n<   hex '148'   // n s makcenom
stringdef o>   hex 'F4'    // o s vokanom
stringdef o"   hex 'F3'    // o s dlznom
stringdef r"   hex '155'   // r s dlznom
stringdef r<   hex '159'   // r s makcenom
stringdef s<   hex '161'   // s s makcenom
stringdef t<   hex '165'   // t s makcenom
stringdef u"   hex 'FA'    // u s dlznom
stringdef u^   hex '16F'   // u s kruzkom
stringdef y"   hex 'FD'    // y s dlznom
stringdef z<   hex '17E'   // z s makcenom
stringdef ia   'ia'        // ia
stringdef ie   'ie'        // ie
stringdef iu   'iu'        // iu

// samohlasky
define v 'a{a"}{a:}e{e"}{e<}i{i"}y{y"}o{o"}{o>}u{u"}{u^}'


define mark_regions as (
	$pV = limit
	$p1 = limit

	do (
		gopast non-v setmark pV
		gopast non-v gopast v setmark p1
	)
)


backwardmode (
	//define RV as $pV <= cursor
	//define R1 as $p1 <= cursor

	define rule1 as (
		[substring] among (
			'nove' (<-'nove')
			'ovy{ch}' 'ovali' 'ovalo' 'ovala' 'ovymi' 'ovym' 'ovy' 'ova' 'ove' 'ovo' 'ovu' 'ovou' 'ovom' 'ovi' 'ovho' 'ovmu' 'ovej'
			'ujeme' 'ujete' 'ujme' 'ujte' 'ujuc' 'ujes' 'ujem'
			'ych' 'ymi' 'eho' 'emu' 'och'
			'jte' 'jme' 'ska'
			'om' 'ou' 'ej' 'ov' 'ym' 'te' 'me' 'ho' 'mu' 'in' 'mi'
			'i' 'e' 'u' 'm' 'a'
			(delete)
		)
	)
)

define un_accent as repeat (
	[substring] among (
		'{a"}' (<-'a')
		'{a:}' (<-'a')
		'{c<}' (<-'c')
		'{d<}' (<-'d')
		'{dz<}' (<-'dz')
		'{e"}' (<-'e')
		'{e<}' (<-'e')
		'{i"}' (<-'i')
		'{l"}' (<-'l')
		'{l<}' (<-'l')
		'{n<}' (<-'n')
		'{o>}' (<-'o')
		'{o"}' (<-'o')
		'{r"}' (<-'r')
		'{r<}' (<-'r')
		'{s<}' (<-'s')
		'{t<}' (<-'t')
		'{u"}' (<-'u')
		'{u^}' (<-'u')
		'{y"}' (<-'y')
		'{z<}' (<-'z')
		'' (next)
	)
)

define lower_case as repeat (
	[substring] among (
		'{A"}' (<-'{a"}')
		'{A:}' (<-'{a:}')
		'{C<}' (<-'{c<}')
		'{D<}' (<-'{d<}')
		'{DZ<}' (<-'{dz<}')
		'{E"}' (<-'{e"}')
		'{E<}' (<-'{e<}')
		'{I"}' (<-'{i"}')
		'{L"}' (<-'{l"}')
		'{L<}' (<-'{l<}')
		'{N<}' (<-'{n<}')
		'{O>}' (<-'{o>}')
		'{O"}' (<-'{o"}')
		'{R"}' (<-'{r"}')
		'{R<}' (<-'{r<}')
		'{S<}' (<-'{s<}')
		'{T<}' (<-'{t<}')
		'{U"}' (<-'{u"}')
		'{U^}' (<-'{u^}')
		'{Y"}' (<-'{y"}')
		'{Z<}' (<-'{z<}')
		'' (next)
	)
)


define stem as (
	do lower_case
	do un_accent
	do mark_regions
	backwards (
		do rule1
	)
)
